Idaho, session 2025, S1214.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Public Utilities Commission the follow-
ing amounts to be expended according to the designated expense classes from
the Public Utilities Commission Fund for the period July 1, 2025, through
June 30, 2026:
FOR:
Personnel Costs $178,700
Operating Expenditures 4,100
Capital Outlay 4,200
TOTAL $187,000
SECTION 2. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In addition to any other authorization
provided by law, the full-time equivalent position authorization provided
to the Public Utilities Commission is hereby increased by two (2.00) for the
period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.